District of Columbia statutes.
2-821

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter:

(1)

The term “inaugural period” means the period which includes the day on which the ceremony of inaugurating the President is held, the 5 calendar days immediately preceding such day, and the 4 calendar days immediately subsequent to such day.

(2)

The term “Inaugural Committee” means the committee in charge of the presidential inaugural ceremony and functions and activities connected therewith, to be appointed by the President-elect.

(3)

The term “Mayor” means the Mayor of the District of Columbia or his designated agent or agents.

(4)

The term “Secretary of Defense” means the Secretary of Defense or his designated agent or agents.

(5)

The term “Secretary of the Interior” means the Secretary of the Interior or his designated agent or agents.

Aug. 6, 1956, 70 Stat. 1049, ch. 974, § 1 (b)
1981 Ed., § 1-1801.
1973 Ed., § 1-1201.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.